Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2539
County personnel officer; appointment.

Only the county board of a county having a personnel policy board may appoint a county personnel officer who shall be a person experienced in the field of personnel administration. The person appointed may be an elected county official, a member of the personnel policy board, a county employee, or a person employed for the position.

Laws 1994, LB 212, § 6.